Missouri, session 2026, HB1695.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.020, 301.074, 301.132, 301.147, 301.190, 301.443, 307.350,
307.375, and 643.315, RSMo, are repealed and nine new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 301.020, 301.074, 301.132, 301.147, 301.190, 301.443, 307.350,
307.375, and 643.315, to read as follows:
301.020. 1. Every owner of a motor vehicle or trailer, which shall be operated or
driven upon the highways of this state, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, shall
annually file, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the director of revenue, an application for
registration on a blank to be furnished by the director of revenue for that purpose containing:
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle or trailer to be registered, including the
name of the manufacturer, the vehicle identification number, the amount of motive power of
the motor vehicle, stated in figures of horsepower and whether the motor vehicle is to be
registered as a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section 301.010;
(2) The name, the applicant's identification number and address of the owner of such
motor vehicle or trailer;
(3) The gross weight of the vehicle and the desired load in pounds if the vehicle is a
commercial motor vehicle or trailer.
2. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section
301.010 and if such vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1695 2
thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information
provided in the vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt access to such information,
together with the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which such
information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This
section shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1989; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
3. If the vehicle is any motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle primarily for business
use, a recreational motor vehicle, motorcycle, motortricycle, autocycle, bus, or any
commercial motor vehicle licensed for over twelve thousand pounds and if such motor
vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty thousand miles on the
odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information provided [in the
vehicle inspection report] by the owner of the vehicle, and provide for prompt access to such
information, together with the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which
such information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This
subsection shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1990; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
4. If the vehicle qualifies as a reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle,
specially constructed motor vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, or prior salvage as referenced in section 301.573, the owner or lienholder shall
surrender the certificate of ownership. The owner shall make an application for a new
certificate of ownership, pay the required title fee, and obtain the vehicle examination
certificate required pursuant to subsection 9 of section 301.190. If an insurance company
pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner retains the
vehicle, as prior salvage, the vehicle shall only be required to meet the examination
requirements under subsection 10 of section 301.190. Notarized bills of sale along with a
copy of the front and back of the certificate of ownership for all major component parts
installed on the vehicle and invoices for all essential parts which are not defined as major
component parts shall accompany the application for a new certificate of ownership. If the
vehicle is a specially constructed motor vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, two pictures of
the vehicle shall be submitted with the application. If the vehicle is a kit vehicle, the
applicant shall submit the invoice and the manufacturer's statement of origin on the kit. If the
vehicle requires the issuance of a special number by the director of revenue or a replacement
vehicle identification number, the applicant shall submit the required application and

HB 1695 3
application fee. All applications required under this subsection shall be submitted with any
applicable taxes which may be due on the purchase of the vehicle or parts. The director of
revenue shall appropriately designate "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", or "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle" on the
current and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership of such vehicle.
5. Every insurance company that pays a claim for repair of a motor vehicle which as
the result of such repairs becomes a reconstructed motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010
or that pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner is
retaining the vehicle shall in writing notify the owner of the vehicle, and in a first party claim,
the lienholder if a lien is in effect, that he is required to surrender the certificate of ownership,
and the documents and fees required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section to obtain a prior
salvage motor vehicle certificate of ownership or documents and fees as otherwise required
by law to obtain a salvage certificate of ownership, from the director of revenue. The
insurance company shall within thirty days of the payment of such claims report to the
director of revenue the name and address of such owner, the year, make, model, vehicle
identification number, and license plate number of the vehicle, and the date of loss and
payment.
6. Anyone who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be guilty of
a class B misdemeanor.
7. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
8. An applicant for registration may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program
fund as established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor fund shall be
used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for

HB 1695 4
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
is interested in making a contribution not less than one dollar as prescribed in this subsection.
9. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations and
deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri medal of honor
recipients fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in the medal of honor recipients
fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in section 226.925, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
100 the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
101 is interested in making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
301.074. License plates issued under sections 301.071 to 301.075 shall be valid for
the duration of the veteran's disability. Each such applicant issued license plates under these
provisions shall annually furnish [proof of vehicle inspection and] proof of disability to the
director, except that an applicant whose service connected disability qualifying him for
special license plates consists in whole or in part of loss of an eye or a limb or an applicant
with a one hundred percent permanent disability, as established by a physician's signed
statement to that effect, need only furnish proof of disability to the director when initially
applying for the special license plates and not thereafter, but in such case proof that the
veteran is alive shall be required annually. No commercial motor vehicle in excess of twenty-
four thousand pounds gross weight may be licensed under the provisions of sections 301.071
to 301.075.
301.132. 1. For purposes of this section, "street rod" is a vehicle older than 1949 or a
vehicle manufactured after 1948 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1949; and has
been altered from the manufacturer's original design or has a body constructed from
nonoriginal materials.
2. The model year and the year of manufacture that are listed on the certificate of title
of a street rod vehicle shall be the model year and year of manufacture that the body of such
vehicle resembles. The current and all subsequent certificates of ownership shall be
designated with the word "REPLICA".
3. For each street rod, there shall be an annual fee equal to the fee charged for
personalized license plates in section 301.144 in addition to the regular annual registration
fees.

HB 1695 5
4. In applying for registration of a street rod pursuant to this section, the owner of the
street rod shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle for which the
application is made:
(1) Will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibitions, club activities,
parades, tours, and similar uses;
(2) Will not be used for general daily transportation.
5. [In addition to the certification required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section,
when applying for registration of a street rod, the new owner of the street rod shall provide
proof that the street rod passed a safety inspection in accordance with section 307.350 that
shall be approved by the department of public safety in consultation with the street rod
community in this state.
6.] On registration of a vehicle pursuant to this section, the director of the department
of revenue shall issue to the owner two license plates containing the number assigned to the
registration certificate issued by the director of revenue, and the following words: "STREET
ROD", "STATE OF MISSOURI". Such license plates shall be kept securely attached to the
motor vehicle registered pursuant to this section. The director of revenue shall determine the
characteristic features of such license plates for vehicles registered pursuant to the provisions
of this section so that they may be recognized as such, except that such license plates shall be
made with fully reflective material with a common color scheme and design, shall be clearly
visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section 301.130.
[7.] 6. Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute of
this state as a condition of sale in the year listed as the year of manufacture on the certificate
of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle
registered pursuant to this section.
[8. Except as provided in subsection 5 of this section,] 7. A vehicle registered
pursuant to this section is exempt from any statute of this state that requires [periodic vehicle
inspections and from any statute of this state that requires] the use and inspection of emission
controls.
[9.] 8. A "custom vehicle" means any motor vehicle that:
(1) Is at least twenty-five years old and of a model year after 1948, or was
manufactured to resemble a vehicle twenty-five years old or older and of a model year after
1948; and
(2) Has been altered from the manufacturer's original design, or has an entire body
constructed from nonoriginal materials.
[10.] 9. The model year and the year of manufacture that are listed on the certificate
of title of a custom vehicle shall be the model year and year of manufacture that the body of

HB 1695 6
such vehicle resembles. The current and all subsequent certificates of ownership shall be
designated with the word "REPLICA".
[11.] 10. For each custom vehicle, there shall be an annual fee equal to the fee
charged for personalized license plates in section 301.144 in addition to the regular annual
registration fees.
[12.] 11. In applying for registration of a custom vehicle pursuant to this section, the
owner of the custom vehicle shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle
for which the application is made:
(1) Will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibits, club activities, parades,
tours, and similar uses; and
(2) Will not be used for general daily transportation.
[13. In addition to the certification required pursuant to subsection 12 of this section,
when applying for registration of a custom vehicle, the new owner of the custom vehicle shall
provide proof that the custom vehicle passed a safety inspection in accordance with section
307.350 that shall be approved by the department of public safety in consultation with the
street rod community in this state.
14.] 12. On registration of a vehicle pursuant to this section, the director of the
department of revenue shall issue to the owner two license plates containing the number
assigned to the registration certificate issued by the director of revenue, and the following
words: "CUSTOM VEHICLE", "STATE OF MISSOURI". Such license plates shall be kept
securely attached to the motor vehicle registered hereunder. The director of revenue shall
determine the characteristic features of such license plates for vehicles registered pursuant to
the provisions of this section so that they may be recognized as such, except that such license
plates shall be made with fully reflective material with a common color scheme and design,
shall be clearly visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section
301.130.
[15.] 13. Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute
of this state as a condition of sale in the year listed as the year of manufacture on the
certificate of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a
vehicle registered pursuant to this section.
[16. Except as provided in subsection 13 of this section, A vehicle registered pursuant
to this section is exempt from any statute of this state that requires periodic vehicle
inspections and from any statute of this state that requires the use and inspection of emission
controls.
17.] 14. For purposes of this section, "blue dot tail light" is a red lamp installed in the
rear of a motor vehicle containing a blue or purple insert that is not more than one inch in
diameter.

HB 1695 7
[18.] 15. A street rod or custom vehicle may use blue dot tail lights for stop lamps,
rear turning indicator lamps, rear hazard lamps, and rear reflectors.
301.147. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.020 to the contrary,
beginning July 1, 2000, the director of revenue may provide owners of motor vehicles, other
than commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of fifty-four thousand pounds gross
weight, the option of biennially registering motor vehicles. Any vehicle manufactured as an
even-numbered model year vehicle shall be renewed each even-numbered calendar year and
any such vehicle manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be renewed each
odd-numbered calendar year, subject to the following requirements:
(1) The fee collected at the time of biennial registration shall include the annual
registration fee plus a pro rata amount for the additional twelve months of the biennial
registration;
(2) Presentation of all documentation otherwise required by law for vehicle
registration including, but not limited to, a personal property tax receipt or certified statement
for the preceding year that no such taxes were due as set forth in section 301.025, proof of [a
motor vehicle safety inspection and] any applicable emission inspection conducted within
sixty days prior to the date of application and proof of insurance as required by section
303.026.
2. The director of revenue may prescribe rules and regulations for the effective
administration of this section. The director is authorized to adopt those rules that are
reasonable and necessary to accomplish the limited duties specifically delegated within this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
promulgated pursuant to the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if
it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after July 1, 2000, shall be invalid and void.
3. The director of revenue shall have the authority to stagger the registration period of
motor vehicles other than commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twelve thousand
pounds gross weight. Once the owner of a motor vehicle chooses the option of biennial
registration, such registration must be maintained for the full twenty-four month period.
301.190. 1. No certificate of registration of any motor vehicle or trailer, or number
plate therefor, shall be issued by the director of revenue unless the applicant therefor shall
make application for and be granted a certificate of ownership of such motor vehicle or trailer,
or shall present satisfactory evidence that such certificate has been previously issued to the
applicant for such motor vehicle or trailer. Application shall be made within thirty days after

HB 1695 8
the applicant acquires the motor vehicle or trailer, unless the motor vehicle was acquired
under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section 301.210 in which case the applicant shall
make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, upon a blank form
furnished by the director of revenue and shall contain the applicant's identification number, a
full description of the motor vehicle or trailer, the vehicle identification number, and the
mileage registered on the odometer at the time of transfer of ownership, as required by section
407.536, together with a statement of the applicant's source of title and of any liens or
encumbrances on the motor vehicle or trailer, provided that for good cause shown the director
of revenue may extend the period of time for making such application. When an owner wants
to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of ownership of a motor
vehicle or trailer that would cause it to be inconsistent with the name or names listed on the
notice of lien, the owner shall provide the director with documentation evidencing the
lienholder's authorization to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of
ownership.
2. The director of revenue shall use reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether the
facts stated in such application are true and shall, to the extent possible without substantially
delaying processing of the application, review any odometer information pertaining to such
motor vehicle that is accessible to the director of revenue. If satisfied that the applicant is the
lawful owner of such motor vehicle or trailer, or otherwise entitled to have the same
registered in his name, the director shall thereupon issue an appropriate certificate over his
signature and sealed with the seal of his office, procured and used for such purpose. The
certificate shall contain on its face a complete description, vehicle identification number, and
other evidence of identification of the motor vehicle or trailer, as the director of revenue may
deem necessary, together with the odometer information required to be put on the face of the
certificate pursuant to section 407.536, a statement of any liens or encumbrances which the
application may show to be thereon, and, if ownership of the vehicle has been transferred, the
name of the state issuing the transferor's title and whether the transferor's odometer mileage
statement executed pursuant to section 407.536 indicated that the true mileage is materially
different from the number of miles shown on the odometer, or is unknown.
3. The director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current and all
subsequent issues of the certificate the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle", or "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", as
defined in section 301.010. Effective July 1, 1990, on all original and all subsequent issues of
the certificate for motor vehicles as referenced in subsections 2 and 3 of section 301.020, the
director shall print on the face thereof the following designation: "Annual odometer updates
may be available from the department of revenue.". On any duplicate certificate, the director
of revenue shall reprint on the face thereof the most recent of either:

HB 1695 9
(1) The mileage information included on the face of the immediately prior certificate
and the date of purchase or issuance of the immediately prior certificate; or
(2) Any other mileage information provided to the director of revenue, and the date
the director obtained or recorded that information.
4. The certificate of ownership issued by the director of revenue shall be
manufactured in a manner to prohibit as nearly as possible the ability to alter, counterfeit,
duplicate, or forge such certificate without ready detection. In order to carry out the
requirements of this subsection, the director of revenue may contract with a nonprofit
scientific or educational institution specializing in the analysis of secure documents to
determine the most effective methods of rendering Missouri certificates of ownership
nonalterable or noncounterfeitable.
5. The fee for each original certificate so issued shall be eight dollars and fifty cents,
in addition to the fee for registration of such motor vehicle or trailer. If application for the
certificate is not made within thirty days after the vehicle is acquired by the applicant, or
where the motor vehicle was acquired under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section
301.210 and the applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title
from the dealer, a delinquency penalty fee of twenty-five dollars for the first thirty days of
delinquency and twenty-five dollars for each thirty days of delinquency thereafter, not to
exceed a total of two hundred dollars, but such penalty may be waived by the director for a
good cause shown. If the director of revenue learns that any person has failed to obtain a
certificate within thirty days after acquiring a motor vehicle or trailer, or where the motor
vehicle was acquired under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section 301.210 and the
applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, or
has sold a vehicle without obtaining a certificate, he shall cancel the registration of all
vehicles registered in the name of the person, either as sole owner or as a co-owner, and shall
notify the person that the cancellation will remain in force until the person pays the
delinquency penalty fee provided in this section, together with all fees, charges and payments
which the person should have paid in connection with the certificate of ownership and
registration of the vehicle. The certificate shall be good for the life of the motor vehicle or
trailer so long as the same is owned or held by the original holder of the certificate and shall
not have to be renewed annually.
6. Any applicant for a certificate of ownership requesting the department of revenue
to process an application for a certificate of ownership in an expeditious manner requiring
special handling shall pay a fee of five dollars in addition to the regular certificate of
ownership fee.

HB 1695 10
7. It is unlawful for any person to operate in this state a motor vehicle or trailer
required to be registered under the provisions of the law unless a certificate of ownership has
been applied for as provided in this section.
8. Before an original Missouri certificate of ownership is issued, an inspection of the
vehicle and a verification of vehicle identification numbers shall be made by the Missouri
state highway patrol on vehicles for which there is a current title issued by another state if a
Missouri salvage certificate of title has been issued for the same vehicle but no prior
inspection and verification has been made in this state, except that if such vehicle has been
inspected in another state by a law enforcement officer in a manner comparable to the
inspection process in this state and the vehicle identification numbers have been so verified,
the applicant shall not be liable for the twenty-five dollar inspection fee if such applicant
submits proof of inspection and vehicle identification number verification to the director of
revenue at the time of the application. The applicant, who has such a title for a vehicle on
which no prior inspection and verification have been made, shall pay a fee of twenty-five
dollars for such verification and inspection, payable to the director of revenue at the time of
the request for the application, which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of
the state highways and transportation department fund.
9. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, kit
vehicle, motor change vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, or other vehicle as required by
the director of revenue shall be accompanied by a vehicle examination certificate issued by
the Missouri state highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the
100 director of revenue. The vehicle examination shall include a verification of vehicle
101 identification numbers and a determination of the classification of the vehicle. The owner of
102 a vehicle which requires a vehicle examination certificate shall present the vehicle for
103 examination and obtain a completed vehicle examination certificate prior to submitting an
104 application for a certificate of ownership to the director of revenue. Notwithstanding any
105 provision of the law to the contrary, an owner presenting a motor vehicle which has been
106 issued a salvage title and which is ten years of age or older to a vehicle examination described
107 in this subsection in order to obtain a certificate of ownership with the designation prior
108 salvage motor vehicle shall not be required to repair or restore the vehicle to its original
109 appearance in order to pass or complete the vehicle examination. The fee for the vehicle
110 examination application shall be twenty-five dollars and shall be collected by the director of
111 revenue at the time of the request for the application and shall be deposited in the state
112 treasury to the credit of the state highways and transportation department fund. If the vehicle
113 is also to be registered in Missouri, the safety inspection required in chapter 307 and the

HB 1695 11
114 emissions inspection required under chapter 643 shall be completed and the fees required by
115 section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be charged to the owner.
116 10. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
117 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri or as required by
118 section 301.020, it shall be accompanied by a current inspection form certified by a duly
119 authorized official inspection station as described in chapter 307. The completed form shall
120 certify that the manufacturer's identification number for the vehicle has been inspected, that it
121 is correctly displayed on the vehicle and shall certify the reading shown on the odometer at
122 the time of inspection. The inspection station shall collect the same fee as authorized in
123 section 307.365 for making the inspection, and the fee shall be deposited in the same manner
124 as provided in section 307.365. If the vehicle is also to be registered in Missouri, [the safety
125 inspection required in chapter 307 and] the emissions inspection required under chapter 643
126 shall be completed and only the fees required by section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be
127 charged to the owner. This section shall not apply to vehicles being transferred on a
128 manufacturer's statement of origin.
129 11. Motor vehicles brought into this state in a wrecked or damaged condition or after
130 being towed as an abandoned vehicle pursuant to another state's abandoned motor vehicle
131 procedures shall, in lieu of the inspection required by subsection 10 of this section, be
132 inspected by the Missouri state highway patrol in accordance with subsection 9 of this
133 section. If the inspection reveals the vehicle to be in a salvage or junk condition, the director
134 shall so indicate on any Missouri certificate of ownership issued for such vehicle. Any
135 salvage designation shall be carried forward on all subsequently issued certificates of title for
136 the motor vehicle.
137 12. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
138 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the
139 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as a
140 reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, or
141 prior salvage vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
142 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the name of the issuing state
143 and such prior designation. The absence of any prior designation shall not relieve a transferor
144 of the duty to exercise due diligence with regard to such certificate of ownership prior to the
145 transfer of a certificate. If a transferor exercises any due diligence with regard to a certificate
146 of ownership, the legal transfer of a certificate of ownership without any designation that is
147 subsequently discovered to have or should have had a designation shall be a transfer free and
148 clear of any liabilities of the transferor associated with the missing designation.
149 13. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
150 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the

HB 1695 12
151 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as non-USA-
152 std motor vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
153 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the words "Non-USA-Std
154 Motor Vehicle".
155 14. The director of revenue and the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
156 patrol shall make and enforce rules for the administration of the inspections required by this
157 section.
158 15. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
159 which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, manufactured forty or more years prior
160 to the current model year, and which has a value of three thousand dollars or less shall be
161 accompanied by:
162 (1) A proper affidavit submitted by the owner explaining how the motor vehicle or
163 trailer was acquired and, if applicable, the reasons a valid certificate of ownership cannot be
164 furnished;
165 (2) Photocopies of receipts, bills of sale establishing ownership, or titles, and the
166 source of all major component parts used to rebuild the vehicle;
167 (3) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars in addition to the fees described in subsection 5
168 of this section. Such fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the state
169 highways and transportation department fund; and
170 (4) An inspection certificate, other than a motor vehicle examination certificate
171 required under subsection 9 of this section, completed and issued by the Missouri state
172 highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the director of revenue.
173 The inspection performed by the highway patrol or other authorized local law enforcement
174 agency shall include a check for stolen vehicles.
175
176 The department of revenue shall issue the owner a certificate of ownership designated with
177 the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle" and deliver such certificate of ownership in
178 accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding subsection 9 of this section,
179 no owner of a reconstructed motor vehicle described in this subsection shall be required to
180 obtain a vehicle examination certificate issued by the Missouri state highway patrol.
301.443. 1. Any legal resident of the state of Missouri who is a veteran of service in
the Armed Forces of the United States and has been honorably discharged from such service
and who is a former prisoner of war and any legal resident of the state of Missouri who is a
former prisoner of war and who was a United States citizen not in the Armed Forces of the
United States during such time is, upon filing an application for registration together with
such information and proof in the form of a statement from the United States Veterans
Administration or the Department of Defense or any other form of proof as the director may

HB 1695 13
require, entitled to receive annually one certificate of registration and one set of license plates
or other evidence of registration as provided in section 301.130 for a motor vehicle other than
a commercial motor vehicle licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight.
There shall be no fee charged for license plates issued under the provisions of this section.
2. Not more than one certificate of registration and one corresponding set of motor
vehicle license plates or other evidence of registration as provided in section 301.130 shall be
issued each year to a qualified former prisoner of war under this section.
3. Proof of ownership [and vehicle inspection] of the particular motor vehicle for
which a registration certificate and set of license plates is requested must be shown at the time
of application. Proof of status as a former prisoner of war as required in subsection 1 of this
section shall only be required on the initial application.
4. As used in this section, "former prisoner of war" means any person who was taken
as an enemy prisoner during World War I, World War II, the Korean Conflict, or the Vietnam
Conflict.
5. The director shall furnish each former prisoner of war obtaining a set of license
plates under the provisions of subsections 1 to 4 of this section special plates which shall have
the words "FORMER P.O.W." on the license plates in preference to the words "SHOW-ME
STATE" as provided in section 301.130 in a form prescribed by the advisory committee
established in section 301.129. Such license plates shall be made with fully reflective
material, shall have a white background with a blue and red configuration at the discretion of
the advisory committee established in section 301.129, shall be clearly visible at night, and
shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section 301.130.
6. Registration certificates and license plates issued under the provisions of this
section shall not be transferable to any other person except that any registered co-owner of the
motor vehicle will be entitled to operate the motor vehicle for the duration of the year licensed
in the event of the death of the qualified former prisoner of war.
7. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 6 of this section to the contrary,
the surviving spouse of a former prisoner of war who has not remarried and who has been
issued license plates described in subsection 5 of this section shall be entitled to transfer such
license plates to the motor vehicle of the surviving spouse and receive annually one certificate
of registration and one set of license plates or other evidence of registration as provided in
section 301.130 as if a former prisoner of war until remarriage. There shall be no fee charged
for the transfer of such license plates.
(2) The department of revenue shall promulgate rules for the obtaining of a set of
license plates described in subsection 5 of this section by the surviving spouse of the former
prisoner of war when such license plates are not issued prior to the death of the former
prisoner of war. The surviving spouse shall be entitled to receive annually one certificate of

HB 1695 14
registration and one set of license plates or other evidence of registration as provided in
section 301.130 as if a former prisoner of war until remarriage. There shall be no fee charged
for the license plates issued pursuant to this subdivision.
307.350. 1. The owner of every commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010; [which is required to be registered in this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles having less than one hundred fifty thousand miles, for the ten-year
period following their model year of manufacture, excluding] prior salvage [vehicles] vehicle,
as defined in section 301.010, immediately following a rebuilding process; and [vehicles]
motor vehicle subject to the provisions of section 307.380[;
(2) Those motor vehicles which are engaged in interstate commerce and are
proportionately registered in this state with the Missouri highway reciprocity commission,
although the owner may request that such vehicle be inspected by an official inspection
station, and a peace officer may stop and inspect such vehicles to determine whether the
mechanical condition is in compliance with the safety regulations established by the United
States Department of Transportation; and
(3) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 301.131;
(4) Vehicles registered in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds for a period of less
than twelve months;] shall submit such [vehicles] vehicleto a biennial inspection of [their] its
mechanism and equipment in accordance with the provisions of sections 307.350 to 307.390
and obtain a certificate of inspection and approval and a sticker, seal, or other device from a
duly authorized official inspection station. The inspection, except the inspection of school
buses which shall be made at the time provided in section 307.375, shall be made at the time
prescribed in the rules and regulations issued by the superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol; but the inspection of a vehicle shall not be made more than sixty days prior to
the date of application for registration or within sixty days of when a vehicle's registration is
transferred; however, if a vehicle was purchased from a motor vehicle dealer and a valid
inspection had been made within sixty days of the purchase date, the new owner shall be able
to utilize an inspection performed within ninety days prior to the application for registration
or transfer. Any vehicle manufactured as an even-numbered model year vehicle shall be
inspected and approved pursuant to the safety inspection program established pursuant to
sections 307.350 to 307.390 in each even-numbered calendar year and any such vehicle
manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved
pursuant to sections 307.350 to 307.390 in each odd-numbered year. The certificate of
inspection and approval shall be a sticker, seal, or other device or combination thereof, as the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol prescribes by regulation and shall be
displayed upon the motor vehicle or trailer as prescribed by the regulations established by
him. The replacement of certificates of inspection and approval which are lost or destroyed

HB 1695 15
shall be made by the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol under regulations
prescribed by him.
2. For the purpose of obtaining an inspection only, it shall be lawful to operate a
vehicle over the most direct route between the owner's usual place of residence and an
inspection station of such owner's choice, notwithstanding the fact that the vehicle does not
have a current state registration license. It shall also be lawful to operate such a vehicle from
an inspection station to another place where repairs may be made and to return the vehicle to
the inspection station notwithstanding the absence of a current state registration license.
3. No person whose motor vehicle was duly inspected and approved as provided in
this section shall be required to have the same motor vehicle again inspected and approved for
the sole reason that such person wishes to obtain a set of any special personalized license
plates available pursuant to section 301.144 or a set of any license plates available pursuant to
section 301.142, prior to the expiration date of such motor vehicle's current registration.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390, violation of this section shall
be deemed an infraction.
307.375. 1. The owner of every bus used to transport children to or from school in
addition to any other inspection required by law shall submit the vehicle to an official
inspection station, and obtain a certificate of inspection, sticker, seal or other device annually,
but the inspection of the vehicle shall not be made more than sixty days prior to operating the
vehicle during the school year. The inspection shall, in addition to the inspection of the
mechanism and equipment required for [all] motor vehicles under the provisions of sections
307.350 to 307.390, include an inspection to ascertain that the following items are correctly
fitted, adjusted, and in good working condition:
(1) All mirrors, including crossview, inside, and outside;
(2) The front and rear warning flashers;
(3) The stop signal arm;
(4) The crossing control arm on public school buses required to have them pursuant to
section 304.050;
(5) The rear bumper to determine that it is flush with the bus so that hitching of rides
cannot occur;
(6) The exhaust tailpipe shall be flush with or may extend not more than two inches
beyond the perimeter of the body or bumper;
(7) The emergency doors and exits to determine them to be unlocked and easily
opened as required;
(8) The lettering and signing on the front, side and rear of the bus;
(9) The service door;
(10) The step treads;

HB 1695 16
(11) The aisle mats or aisle runners;
(12) The emergency equipment which shall include as a minimum a first aid kit,
flares or fuses, and a fire extinguisher;
(13) The seats, including a determination that they are securely fastened to the floor;
(14) The emergency door buzzer;
(15) All hand hold grips;
(16) The interior glazing of the bus.
2. In addition to the inspection required by subsection 1 of this section, the Missouri
state highway patrol shall conduct an inspection after February first of each school year of all
vehicles required to be marked as school buses under section 304.050. This inspection shall
be conducted by the Missouri highway patrol in cooperation with the department of
elementary and secondary education and shall include, as a minimum, items in subsection 1
of this section and the following:
(1) The driver seat belts;
(2) The heating and defrosting systems;
(3) The reflectors;
(4) The bus steps;
(5) The aisles;
(6) The frame.
3. If, upon inspection, conditions which violate the standards in subsection 2 of this
section are found, the owner or operator shall have them corrected in ten days and notify the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol or those persons authorized by the
superintendent. If the defects or unsafe conditions found constitute an immediate danger, the
bus shall not be used until corrections are made and the superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol or those persons authorized by the superintendent are notified.
4. The Missouri highway patrol may inspect any school bus at any time and if such
inspection reveals a deficiency affecting the safe operation of the bus, the provisions of
subsection 3 of this section shall be applicable.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390 to the contrary, A violation of
this section shall be a class C misdemeanor.
643.315. 1. Except as provided in sections 643.300 to 643.355, all motor vehicles
which are domiciled, registered or primarily operated in an area for which the commission
has established a motor vehicle emissions inspection program pursuant to sections 643.300 to
643.355 shall be inspected and approved prior to sale or transfer; provided that, if such
vehicle is inspected and approved prior to sale or transfer, such vehicle shall not be subject to
another emissions inspection for ninety days after the date of sale or transfer of such vehicle.
In addition, any such vehicle manufactured as an even-numbered model year vehicle shall be

HB 1695 17
inspected and approved under the emissions inspection program established pursuant to
sections 643.300 to 643.355 in each even-numbered calendar year and any such vehicle
manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved under
the emissions inspection program established pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355 in each
odd-numbered calendar year. All motor vehicles subject to the inspection requirements of
sections 643.300 to 643.355 shall display a valid emissions inspection sticker, and when
applicable, a valid emissions inspection certificate shall be presented at the time of
registration or registration renewal of such motor vehicle. The department of revenue shall
require evidence of the safety and emission inspection and approval required by this section
in issuing the motor vehicle annual registration in conformity with the procedure required by
sections 307.350 to 307.390 and sections 643.300 to 643.355. The director of revenue may
verify that a successful safety and emissions inspection was completed via electronic means.
2. The inspection requirement of subsection 1 of this section shall apply to all motor
vehicles except:
(1) Motor vehicles with a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating in excess of
eight thousand five hundred pounds;
(2) Motorcycles and motortricycles if such vehicles are exempted from the motor
vehicle emissions inspection under federal regulation and approved by the commission by
rule;
(3) Model year vehicles manufactured prior to 1996;
(4) Vehicles which are powered exclusively by electric or hydrogen power or by fuels
other than gasoline which are exempted from the motor vehicle emissions inspection under
federal regulation and approved by the commission by rule;
(5) Motor vehicles registered in an area subject to the inspection requirements of
sections 643.300 to 643.355 which are domiciled and operated exclusively in an area of the
state not subject to the inspection requirements of sections 643.300 to 643.355, but only if the
owner of such vehicle presents to the department an affidavit that the vehicle will be operated
exclusively in an area of the state not subject to the inspection requirements of sections
643.300 to 643.355 for the next twenty-four months, and the owner applies for and receives a
waiver which shall be presented at the time of registration or registration renewal;
(6) New and unused motor vehicles, of model years of the current calendar year and
of any calendar year within two years of such calendar year, which have an odometer reading
of less than six thousand miles at the time of original sale by a motor vehicle manufacturer or
licensed motor vehicle dealer to the first user;
(7) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 301.131;
(8) School buses;

HB 1695 18
(9) Heavy-duty diesel-powered vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating in excess
of eight thousand five hundred pounds;
(10) New motor vehicles that have not been previously titled and registered, for the
four-year period following their model year of manufacture[, provided the odometer reading
for such motor vehicles are under forty thousand miles at their first required biennial safety
inspection conducted under sections 307.350 to 307.390; otherwise such motor vehicles shall
be subject to the emissions inspection requirements of subsection 1 of this section during the
same period that the biennial safety inspection is conducted];
(11) Motor vehicles that are driven fewer than twelve thousand miles between
biennial [safety inspections] registration periods; and
(12) Qualified plug-in electric drive vehicles. For the purposes of this section,
"qualified plug-in electric drive vehicle" shall mean a plug-in electric drive vehicle that is
made by a manufacturer, has not been modified from original manufacturer specifications,
and can operate solely on electric power and is capable of recharging its battery from an on-
board generation source and an off-board electricity source.
3. The commission may, by rule, allow inspection reciprocity with other states having
equivalent or more stringent testing and waiver requirements than those established pursuant
to sections 643.300 to 643.355.
4. (1) At the time of sale, a licensed motor vehicle dealer, as defined in section
301.550, may choose to sell a motor vehicle subject to the inspection requirements of sections
643.300 to 643.355 either:
(a) With prior inspection and approval as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection; or
(b) Without prior inspection and approval as provided in subdivision (3) of this
subsection.
(2) If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle with prior inspection and approval, the
dealer shall disclose, in writing, prior to sale, whether the vehicle obtained approval by
meeting the emissions standards established pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.355 or by
obtaining a waiver pursuant to section 643.335. A vehicle sold pursuant to this subdivision by
a licensed motor vehicle dealer shall be inspected and approved within the one hundred
twenty days immediately preceding the date of sale, and, for the purpose of registration of
such vehicle, such inspection shall be considered timely.
(3) If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle without prior inspection and approval, the
purchaser may return the vehicle within ten days of the date of purchase, provided that the
vehicle has no more than one thousand additional miles since the time of sale, if the vehicle
fails, upon inspection, to meet the emissions standards specified by the commission and the
dealer shall have the vehicle inspected and approved without the option for a waiver of the

HB 1695 19
emissions standard and return the vehicle to the purchaser with a valid emissions certificate
and sticker within five working days or the purchaser and dealer may enter into any other
mutually acceptable agreement. If the dealer chooses to sell the vehicle without prior
inspection and approval, the dealer shall disclose conspicuously on the sales contract and bill
of sale that the purchaser has the option to return the vehicle within ten days, provided that the
vehicle has no more than one thousand additional miles since the time of sale, to have the
dealer repair the vehicle and provide an emissions certificate and sticker within five working
days if the vehicle fails, upon inspection, to meet the emissions standards established by the
commission, or enter into any mutually acceptable agreement with the dealer. A violation of
this subdivision shall be an unlawful practice as defined in section 407.020. No emissions
inspection shall be required pursuant to sections 643.300 to 643.360 for the sale of any motor
vehicle which may be sold without a certificate of inspection and approval, as provided
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 307.380.
Section B. Section A of this act shall become effective January 1, 2027.
✔